Hawaii statutes.
[§346-397] Provision of extended foster
care services. As soon as the department determines that a young adult is
eligible under section 346-395 and the young adult signs the voluntary care
agreement as described in section 346-396, prior to the filing of the petition
invoking the jurisdiction of the court or the court's determination of
jurisdiction pursuant to section 346-398, the department may provide extended
foster care services to the young adult. [L 2013, c 252, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next